Washington statutes.
RCW 7.54.120

Application.

(1) This chapter applies to partition actions filed on or after July 23, 2023.

(2) In an action to partition real property under chapter 7.52 RCW, the court shall determine whether the property is heirs property. If the court determines that the property is heirs property, the property must be partitioned under this chapter unless all of the cotenants otherwise agree in a record.

(3) This chapter supplements chapter 7.52 RCW and, if an action is governed by this chapter, replaces provisions of chapter 7.52 RCW that are inconsistent with this chapter.

[ 2023 c 6 s 103.]